Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.245

Public transportation function—Authorization by election required—Procedure.

Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 35.58 RCW a metropolitan municipal corporation may perform the function of metropolitan public transportation only if the performance of such function is authorized by election. The metropolitan council may call such election and certify the ballot proposition. The election shall be conducted and canvassed as provided in RCW 35.58.090 and the municipality shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan public transportation if a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote in favor.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 303 s 1.]